Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201760-6,177
Signs relating to overtaking and passing school buses.

The Department of Transportation shall post on highways of the state highway system outside of business and residential districts signs to the effect that it is unlawful to pass school buses stopped to load or unload children. Such signs shall be adequate in size and number to properly inform the public of the provisions relative to such passing.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 61;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-661;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 273;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 211.